Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-416
Building regulations; other laws; applicability.

Wherever the regulations made under authority of sections 14-401 to 14-418 require a greater width or size of yards, courts, or other open spaces, or require a lower height of building or less number of stories, or require a greater percentage of lot to be left unoccupied, or impose other higher standards than are required in any other statute, local ordinance, or regulation, the provisions of the regulations made under authority of such sections shall govern. Wherever the provisions of any other statute, local ordinance, or regulation require a greater width or size of yards, courts, or other open spaces, or require a lower height of building or a less number of stories, or require a greater percentage of lot to be left unoccupied, or impose other higher standards than are required by the regulations made under authority of such sections, the provisions of such statute, local ordinance, or regulation shall govern.

Laws 1925, c. 45, § 10, p. 185;

C.S.1929, § 14-413;

R.S.1943, § 14-416;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 146.
July 21, 2022